Georgia, session 2025_26, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-8-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to exemptions from
sales and use taxes, is amended by revising paragraph (85) as follows:
"(85)(A) For 11 days beginning on the second Friday of October each year, sales of
firearms, ammunition, gun safes, and related accessories, including, but not limited to,
stocks, barrels, scopes, and magazines;
(B) This paragraph shall stand repealed and reserved on July 1, 2030. Reserved;"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 47
- 1 -